trunk/aymara/morphology/Aymara Morph Analyzer release/spellcheck/aymara-rul_spelling.script
clear stack

define Vow [a|i|u] ;

define Cons [ c h | c h h | c h %' | p | p h | p %' | t | t h | t %' |
                k |   k h |   k %' | q |   q h |   q %' | m | w |
		s | n | l | l l | r | ñ | y | j | x ] ;

define R0  %^Z -> 0 ;

define R1 %^YA -> [0 | y a] || _ [%^V | %^L]	
.o.
%^YA -> y a
.o.
%^L  -> %^V y a || _  %^LENGTHVSYA %^L	
.o.
%^LENGTHVSYA -> 0	
.o.
%^IN -> 0 || _ %^N t i 
.o.
%^IN -> n ;

define R2       %^L %^C i %^S -> %^S || %^C p a c h a  _ 
.o.
c h i %^C -> s || _ [t|s]
.o.
%^W -> 0 || %^V n a  _  %^V k i		
.o.
%^W -> 0 || _ [ %^C | %^FVD | %^LAYKU ]
.o.
%^W -> 0 || _ [ %^L | %^V ]
.o.
[ a | i | u ] -> 0 || _ %^W %^N
.o.
%^W -> 0
.o.
%^S -> 0 || _ [ %^L | %^V ]
.o.
%^S -> 0 || _ [ %^C | %^FVD | %^LAYKU ]
.o.
%^S -> 0	
.o.
%^LAYKU -> %^C || $[Vow ?* Vow ?* Vow]  _	
.o.
%^LAYKU -> %^V	
.o.
[a|i|u] %^V (->) 0 ||   .#. Cons* Vow (%^L) Cons+ Vow (%^L) Cons+  _
.o.
%^V -> 0	
.o.
$[%^L %^L] -> ~[?*] 	
.o.
[ ä | ï | ü ] %^L -> ~[?*] 	
.o.
%^C %^FVD ->  ~[?*] 
.o.
Cons [ %^L | %^FVD ] -> ~[?*] 	
;

define R3        %^C c h i %^C i r i s k a -> %^C i r i s k c h i   
.o.
%^C c h i %^C i r i s k ä -> %^C i r i s k c h ï   
.o.
[..] -> [ s | j ] i || .#. _ s a %^C \[a|i|u]
.o.
u %^C i -> u	
.o.
u %^L %^C i -> ü	
.o.
[ a | i ] %^L %^C i -> ï  
.o.
a -> ä , i -> ï , u -> ü || _ %^L      
.o.
%^L -> 0
.o.
[a | i | u] -> 0 || _ [ %^C | %^FVD ] 
.o.
ä (->) a , ï (->) i , ü (->) u || _ %^C 	
.o.
%^J -> h || .#. [a|u] k %^C _ 
.o.
%^J -> j
.o.
[ %^FVD | %^C ]  -> 0
;

define R4 %^N -> 0  
;

define R5 s t ü (->) t ü s || k i _ t u	
.o.
s t ä (->) t ä s || k i _ t a
;

define AccCap  a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, 
g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, 
n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, 
u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, ñ (->) Ñ || .#. _  
;

read regex R0 .o. R1 .o. R2 .o. R3 .o. R4 .o. R5 .o. AccCap ;
stack
